Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Actions Limited

§ 501.
Recovery of lands.

Except as otherwise provided in

32 V.S.A. § 5263

, an action for the recovery of lands, or the possession thereof, shall not be maintained, unless commenced within 15 years after the cause of action first accrues to the plaintiff or those under whom he or she claims.

HISTORY:

Amended,

1959, No. 218

, § 6.

Partial occupation.

Although a claim of adverse possession that proceeds under bare claim of right extends only to that property which claimant has actually occupied, a claimant may also, under doctrine of constructive possession, achieve possession of an entire plot of land through actual occupation of a part. N.A.S. Holdings, Inc. v. Pafundi, 169 Vt. 437, 736 A.2d 780, 1999 Vt. LEXIS 208 (1999), cert. denied, 528 U.S. 1079, 120 S. Ct. 798, 145 L. Ed. 2d 672, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 186 (2000).

Because trial court found that property in question was clearly bounded, its conclusion that claimant had established adverse possession of quarry floor necessarily led to conclusion that she established adverse possession of entire quarry, and therefore trial court’s denial of adverse possession with respect to quarry walls was reversed. N.A.S. Holdings, Inc. v. Pafundi, 169 Vt. 437, 736 A.2d 780, 1999 Vt. LEXIS 208 (1999), cert. denied, 528 U.S. 1079, 120 S. Ct. 798, 145 L. Ed. 2d 672, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 186 (2000).

Where a person, without title, or color of title, enters upon vacant lot, and actually occupies portion of it, and the lot has a definite boundary, marked upon land, such person, by claiming to be owner to boundary lines of lot, has constructive possession of whole, and will acquire a title to whole by such partial occupation for 15 years, and such entry and claim give him a good prior possession of the whole, and a good title thereto against all the world, except true owner. Webb v. Richardson, 42 Vt. 465 (1869); Hodges v. Eddy, 38 Vt. 327 (1865), same case 41 Vt. 485, 52 Vt. 434; Jakeway v. Barrett, 38 Vt. 316 (1865); Pearsal v. Thorp, 1 D. Chip. 92 (1797), same case 2 Aik. 88, 161.

§ 502.
Entry into houses or lands.

A person having right or title of entry into houses or lands shall not enter after 15 years from the time such right of entry accrues.

§ 503.
Covenant of seisin.

Actions brought on a covenant of seisin in a deed of conveyance of land shall be brought within 15 years after the cause of actions accrues, and not after.

§ 504.
Covenant of warranty.

An action founded on covenant of warranty in a deed of land shall be brought only within eight years after a final decision against the title of the covenantor in such deed.

§ 505.
Covenants other than warranty or seisin.

An action founded on covenant, contained in a deed of lands, other than the covenants of warranty and seisin, shall be brought within eight years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 506.
Judgments.

Actions on judgments and actions for the renewal or revival of judgments shall be brought by filing a new and independent action on the judgment within eight years after the rendition of the judgment, and not after.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. March 29, 1972;

2009, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 29, 2010.

§ 507.
Specialties.

Actions on specialties shall be brought within eight years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 508.
Witnessed promissory note.

An action brought on a promissory note signed in the presence of an attesting witness shall be commenced within 14 years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 509.
Evidence of debt issued by a monied corporation.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to an action brought to enforce payment on any bills, notes, or other evidences of debt issued by a bank or other monied corporation and put into circulation as money.

§ 510.
Liability of stockholders and of foreign corporations.

An action to enforce the liability of stockholders to the creditors or for the indebtedness of foreign corporations shall be brought within the time limited by the laws of the state under which they are incorporated, and not after.
This section shall not be construed so as to extend the time under which such actions may be maintained under the laws of this State.

§ 511.
Civil action.

A civil action, except one brought upon the judgment or decree of a court of record of the United States or of this or some other state, and except as otherwise provided, shall be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues and not thereafter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 3.

§ 512.
Assault and battery; false imprisonment; slander and libel; injuries to person or property.

Actions for the following causes shall be commenced within three years after the cause of action accrues, and not after:

assault and battery;

false imprisonment;

slander and libel;

except as otherwise provided in this chapter, injuries to the person suffered by the act or default of another person, provided that the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue as of the date of the discovery of the injury;

damage to personal property suffered by the act or default of another.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 32

, § 2, eff. March 16, 1967;

1975, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 513.
Skiing, injuries sustained while participating in sport of.

An action to recover for injuries sustained while participating in the sport of skiing shall be commenced within one year after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 514.
Insufficiency of bridge.

An action against a town for the recovery of damages caused by the insufficiency or want of repair of a bridge or culvert shall be commenced within two years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 515.
Neglect of official duty of town clerk.

An action against a town, or town clerk, to recover damages for neglect of duty of such clerk in relation to a deed, execution, or other instrument delivered to him or her or left at his or her office for record, shall be brought only within six years after a final decision based upon such neglect and adverse to the right, title, or claim of the party under such deed, execution, or instrument, and not after.

§ 516.
Misfeasance of sheriff or deputy.

Actions against sheriffs for the misconduct or negligence of their deputies shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 517.
Taxes paid under protest.

An action to recover money paid under protest for taxes shall be commenced within one year after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

§ 518.
Ionizing radiation injury; latent.

An action to recover for ionizing radiation injury or injury from other noxious agents medically recognized as having a prolonged latent development shall be commenced within three years after the person suffering the injury has knowledge or ought reasonably to have knowledge of having suffered the injury and of the cause thereof, but in no event more than 20 years from the date of the last occurrence to which the injury is attributed.

An action or proceeding to recover for latent ionizing radiation injury, or injury from other noxious agents medically recognized as having a prolonged latent development shall not be barred by recovery in any earlier action or proceeding, unless the plaintiff in the earlier action or proceeding was actually awarded damages for the latent injury, or knew or reasonably could be expected to know that such latent injury would occur, and its nature and extent with sufficient particularity to establish entitlement to a specific amount of damages on account thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 32

, § 1, eff. March 16, 1967.

§ 519.
Emergency medical care.

A person who knows that another is exposed to grave physical harm shall, to the extent that the same can be rendered without danger or peril to himself or herself or without interference with important duties owed to others, give reasonable assistance to the exposed person unless that assistance or care is being provided by others.

A person who provides reasonable assistance in compliance with subsection (a) of this section shall not be liable in civil damages unless his or her acts constitute gross negligence or unless he or she will receive or expects to receive remuneration. Nothing contained in this subsection shall alter existing law with respect to tort liability of a practitioner of the healing arts for acts committed in the ordinary course of his or her practice.

A person who willfully violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

1967, No. 309

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2-4, eff. March 22, 1968.

§ 520.
Payment of wages.

Actions brought on a violation of

21 V.S.A. § 342

shall be brought within two years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 1978.

§ 521.
Medical malpractice.

Notwithstanding section 512 of this title, and except as provided in sections 518 and 551 of this title, actions to recover damages for injuries to the person arising out of any medical or surgical treatment or operation shall be brought within three years of the date of the incident or two years from the date the injury is or reasonably should have been discovered, whichever occurs later, but not later than seven years from the date of the incident.
No statute of limitations shall limit the right to recover damages for injuries to the person arising out of any medical or surgical treatment or operation where fraudulent concealment has prevented the patient’s discovery of the negligence.
Where the action is based upon the discovery of a foreign object in the patient’s body, which is not discovered within the period of limitation under this section, the action may be commenced within two years of the date of the discovery of the foreign object.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 522.
Actions based on childhood sexual or physical abuse.

A civil action brought by any person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of childhood sexual or physical abuse may be commenced at any time after the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition. The victim need not establish which act in a series of continuing physical abuse or sexual abuse or exploitation incidents caused the injury.

If a complaint is filed alleging an act of childhood sexual or physical abuse, the complaint shall immediately be sealed by the clerk of the court. The complaint shall remain sealed until the answer is served or, if the defendant files a motion to dismiss under Rule 12(b) of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, until the court rules on that motion. If the complaint is dismissed, the complaint and any related papers or pleadings shall remain sealed. Any hearing held in connection with the motion to dismiss shall be in camera.

As used in this section:

“Childhood sexual abuse” means any act committed by the defendant against a complainant who was under 18 years of age at the time of the act and which act would have constituted a violation of a statute prohibiting lewd and lascivious conduct, lewd or lascivious conduct with a child, felony sexual exploitation of a minor in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 3258(c)

, sexual assault, or aggravated sexual assault in effect at the time the act was committed.

“Childhood physical abuse” means any act other than an attempt committed by the defendant against a complainant who was under 18 years of age at the time of the act and which act would have constituted a violation of a statute prohibiting aggravated assault in effect at the time the act was committed.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 214

, this section shall apply retroactively to childhood sexual abuse that occurred prior to July 1, 2019, irrespective of any statute of limitations in effect at the time the abuse occurred. In an action based on childhood sexual abuse that would have been barred by any statute of limitations in effect on June 30, 2019, damages may be awarded against an entity that employed, supervised, or had responsibility for the person allegedly committing the sexual abuse only if there is a finding of gross negligence on the part of the entity.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 214

, this section shall apply retroactively to childhood physical abuse that occurred prior to July 1, 2021, irrespective of any statute of limitations in effect at the time the abuse occurred. In an action based on childhood physical abuse that would have been barred by any statute of limitations in effect on June 30, 2021, damages may be awarded against an entity that employed, supervised, or had responsibility for the person allegedly committing the physical abuse only if there is a finding of gross negligence on the part of the entity.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 292

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2019, No. 37

, § 1;

2021, No. 26

, § 1.

Particular cases.

When a former patient alleged that her surgeon had sexually assaulted her under the guise of treating her when she was a teenager, it was error to hold that her suit was time-barred, as a reasonable jury could conclude that even though she suspected that the surgeon had examined her to satisfy his sexual desires rather than treat her hip/groin injury, she did not and could not have reasonably discovered the alleged legal injury until she learned through media reports that the surgeon had been charged with assaulting other women in a similar manner. A reasonable jury could come to such a conclusion by considering the position of trust and authority established by the surgeon as the patient’s longstanding doctor, the fact that the patient was being treated for an injury near an intimate part of her body, and the lack of a response from the patient’s family affirming her vacillating concerns about the surgeon’s methods of examination and treatment. Clarke v. Abate, 2013 VT 52, 194 Vt. 294, 80 A.3d 578, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 69 (2013).

Surgeon could not prevail on the grounds that a former patient failed to challenge his statement of undisputed facts insofar as the court had ruled that those statements were insufficient to support the trial court’s summary judgment ruling in favor of the surgeon based on the patient’s alleged acknowledgement of defendant’s wrongful conduct. The patient never conceded that she knew or should have known of the wrongfulness of the surgeon’s conduct, which was the ultimate factual question for the jury to resolve in determining whether the statute of limitations had run. Clarke v. Abate, 2013 VT 52, 194 Vt. 294, 80 A.3d 578, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 69 (2013).

By acknowledging, in response to the court’s questioning, that a patient had concerns early on about the appropriateness of her surgeon’s examinations, the patient’s counsel did not concede that the patient had knowledge sufficient to trigger the running of the applicable statute of limitations. Clarke v. Abate, 2013 VT 52, 194 Vt. 294, 80 A.3d 578, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 69 (2013).

Defendant was not entitled to summary judgment or judgment as a matter of law under the statute prescribing the limitations period for actions based on childhood sexual abuse. Plaintiff linked his long-term mental health issues to the conduct of defendant’s priest in 2002 or 2004, well after the 1984 cut-off date in the retroactivity provision; while defendant could point to other evidence that might support its view that plaintiff was aware or should have been aware much earlier, at best there was a genuine issue of material fact that precluded grant of summary judgment, and there was a legally sufficient basis for the jury to find for plaintiff on the issue. Turner v. Roman Catholic Diocese of Burlington, 2009 VT 101, 186 Vt. 396, 987 A.2d 960, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 118 (2009).

Trial court erred in granting plaintiff judgment as a matter of law under the statute prescribing the limitations period for actions based on childhood sexual abuse. A priest’s position in defendant’s diocese, and the evidence that plaintiff knew that the priest had abused others, were sufficient for the jury to find that plaintiff was on inquiry notice from those facts, and to conclude that the time for filing an action against defendant had commenced. Turner v. Roman Catholic Diocese of Burlington, 2009 VT 101, 186 Vt. 396, 987 A.2d 960, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 118 (2009).

§ 523.
Trade secrets.

An action for misappropriation of trade secrets under 9 V.S.A. chapter 143 shall be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues, and not after. The cause of action shall be deemed to accrue as of the date the misappropriation was discovered or reasonably should have been discovered.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 524.
Actions based on residential building energy standards.

Except in the case of fraud, an action under

30 V.S.A. § 51(g)

shall be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues, and not after.

The cause of action shall be deemed to accrue as of the date of the recording of a copy of the certificate in the town land records, the date of filing with the Department of Public Service, or the date of occupancy, whichever comes first.

This section shall apply only to actions under

30 V.S.A. § 51(g)

, and shall not be construed to affect other rights and remedies provided by statute or common law.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 20

, § 3.